Utah statutes.
16-10a-807.   Resignation of directors.

(1)  A director may resign at any time by giving a written notice of resignation to the board of directors, the board's chair, or the corporation's secretary.

(2) (a)  A resignation of a director is effective when the notice is received by the corporation unless the notice specifies a later effective date or an effective date determined by the happening of an event.

(b)  A notice of resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

(3)  A director who resigns may deliver to the division for filing a statement of the director's resignation pursuant to Section 16-10a-1608.



Amended by Chapter 85, 2007 General Session

